Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Juvenile Justice Act
§ 14-6-203.
Jurisdiction; confidentiality of records. [Effective July 1, 2024]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

Coincident with proceedings concerning a minor alleged to be delinquent, the court has jurisdiction to:

Determine questions concerning the right to legal custody of the minor;

Order any party to the proceedings to perform any acts, duties and responsibilities the court deems necessary; or

Order any party to the proceedings to refrain from any act or conduct the court deems detrimental to the best interest and welfare of the minor or essential to the enforcement of any lawful order of disposition of the minor made by the court.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction in all cases, other than status offenses, in which a minor is alleged to have committed a criminal offense or to have violated a municipal ordinance.

The juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction in all cases, other than status offenses, in which a minor who has not attained the age of thirteen (13) years is alleged to have committed a felony or a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for more than six (6) months.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, all cases over which the juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction shall be originally commenced in the juvenile court but may thereafter be transferred to another court having jurisdiction pursuant to W.S.

14-6-237

.

The district attorney shall establish objective criteria, screening and assessment procedures for determining the court for appropriate disposition in cooperation and coordination with each municipality in the jurisdiction of the district court. The district attorney shall serve as the single point of entry for all minors alleged to have committed a crime. Except as otherwise provided in this section, copies of all charging documents, reports or citations for cases provided in this subsection shall be forwarded to the district attorney prior to the filing of the charge, report or citation in municipal or city court. The following cases, excluding status offenses, may be originally commenced either in the juvenile court or in the district court or inferior court having jurisdiction:

Violations of municipal ordinances, except that if a juvenile is sentenced in a municipal court to a sentence exceeding ten (10) days of jail or detention, the municipal court shall provide to the district attorney in the juvenile’s county of residency and the department of education a copy of the judgment and sentence;

All misdemeanors except:

Those cases within the exclusive jurisdiction of the juvenile court; and

If a juvenile is sentenced in a municipal or circuit court to a sentence exceeding ten (10) days of jail or detention, the municipal or circuit court shall provide to the district attorney in the juvenile’s county of residency and the department of education a copy of the judgment and sentence.

Felony cases in which the minor has attained the age of seventeen (17) years. The prosecuting attorney shall consider those determinative factors set forth in W.S. 14-6-237(b)(i) through (vii) prior to commencing an action in the district court under this paragraph;

Cases in which the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years and is charged with a violent felony as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii);

Cases in which a minor who has attained the age of fourteen (14) years is charged with a felony and has previously been adjudicated as a delinquent under two (2) separately filed juvenile petitions for acts which if committed by an adult constitute felonies.

Except as provided by subsection (j) of this section, all information, reports or records made, received or kept by any municipal, county or state officer or employee evidencing any legal or administrative process or disposition resulting from a minor’s misconduct are confidential and subject to the provisions of this act. The existence of the information, reports or records or contents thereof shall not be disclosed by any person unless:

Disclosure results from an action brought or authorized by the district attorney in a court of public record;

The person the records concern is under eighteen (18) years of age and, in conjunction with one (1) of his parents or with the ratification of the court, authorizes the disclosure;

The person the records concern is eighteen (18) years of age or older and authorizes the disclosure;

The disclosure results from the information being shared with or between designated employees of any court, any law enforcement agency, any prosecutor’s office, any employee of the victim services division within the office of the attorney general, any probation office or any employee of the department of family services or the minor’s past or present school district who has been designated to share the information by the department of family services or by the school district or anyone else designated by the district attorney in determining the appropriate court pursuant to a single point of entry assessment under this section;

The disclosure is made to a victim of a delinquent act constituting a felony, in accordance with W.S.

14-6-501

through

14-6-509

;

The disclosure is authorized by W.S.

14-6-604

; or

The disclosure is made to an administrative employee or member of the board of trustees of the minor’s school district, authorized by the court to receive the information, for purposes of the suspension or expulsion of the minor pursuant to W.S. 21-4-305(c)(ii), provided:

The court finds that the court action involves matters which are relevant to the suspension or expulsion of the minor pursuant to W.S. 21-4-305(e). Only materials and evidence relevant to the minor’s potential suspension or expulsion shall be disclosed to an administrative employee or member of the board of trustees of the minor’s school district; and

The school district administrative employees or board of trustee members authorized to receive the minor’s confidential information shall only disclose the information:

To other members of the board of trustees or the superintendent for purposes of W.S. 21-4-305(c)(ii); and

To the minor and his parents, legal guardians, attorneys or guardian ad litem.

Nothing contained in this act is construed to deprive the district court of jurisdiction to determine questions of custody, parental rights, guardianship or any other questions involving minors, when the questions are the subject of or incidental to suits or actions commenced in or transferred to the district court as provided by law.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require confidentiality of any matter, legal record, identity or disposition pertaining to a minor charged or processed through any municipal or circuit court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.4; Laws 1973, ch. 225, § 1; 1976, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

14-8-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1985, ch. 37, § 1; 1989, ch. 117, § 1; ch. 247, § 2; 1994, ch. 84, § 1; 1995, ch. 63, § 1; ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 27, § 2; ch. 28, § 1; ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 65, § 1; ch. 81, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2001, ch. 118, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 127, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 146, § 1; 2013 ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 14-6-204.
Venue; change of venue or judge.

Proceedings under this act may be commenced in the county where the child is living or is present when the proceedings are commenced or in the county where the alleged delinquent act occurred. Change of venue or change of judge may be had under the circumstances and upon the terms and conditions provided by law in a civil action in the district court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.5; W.S. 1977, §

14-8-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to transfer of trial and change of judge, see Rule 40.1, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Constitution's venue provision does not apply to juvenile delinquency proceedings. —

The venue provision in Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 10 does not apply to juvenile delinquency proceedings which are, instead, controlled by this section. NJC v. State, 913 P.2d 435,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1996).

Venue provision in Juvenile Court Act constitutional. —

The venue provision in the Juvenile Court Act which allows a juvenile delinquency proceeding to be brought where the alleged delinquent act occurs or where the juvenile resides is not in conflict with the venue provision of Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 10. The venue provision in the constitution is inapplicable to juvenile delinquency matters because these proceedings are not deemed criminal. NJC v. State, 913 P.2d 435,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 14-6-205.
Taking of child into custody; when permitted.

A child may be taken into custody by a law enforcement officer without a warrant or court order when:

The circumstances would permit an arrest without a warrant under W.S.

7-2-102

;

There are reasonable grounds to believe the child has violated the terms of an order of the juvenile court issued pursuant to this act; or

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

The child’s conduct or behavior seriously endangers himself or the person or property of others and immediate custody appears necessary.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.6; W.S. 1977, §

14-8-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2008, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), added “or” at the end of (ii); and made a related changes in (iv).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “issued pursuant to this act” in (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Quoted

in

City of Laramie v. Hysong, 808 P.2d 199,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Child Protection: A Suggested Role for Members of the Wyoming State Bar,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1974).

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of court to order juvenile delinquent incarcerated in adult penal institution, 95 ALR3d 568.

When, under terms of Federal Youth Corrections Act (18 USC § 5005 et seq. [repealed]), must prisoner serving youth corrections sentence be segregated from adult prison population, 59 ALR Fed 746.

§ 14-6-206.
Child in custody; no detention without court order; exceptions; notice to parent or guardian; release.

In accordance with procedures specified in W.S. 7-1-108(c) and (d), a child taken into custody shall not be held in detention or placed in shelter care without a court order unless detention or shelter care is required to:

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

Protect the person or property of others;

Prevent the child from absconding or being removed from the jurisdiction of the court; or

Provide the child having no parent, guardian, custodian or other responsible adult with supervision and care and return him to the court when required.

Any person taking a child into custody shall as soon as possible notify the child’s parent, guardian or custodian. Unless the child’s detention or shelter care is authorized by a court order issued pursuant to this act or required for one (1) of the reasons in subsection (a) of this section, the child shall be released to the care of his parent, guardian, custodian or other responsible adult upon that person’s written promise to present the child before the court upon request.

After issuing any citation to a child for a violation of a state or federal law or a municipal ordinance for which incarceration or a fine may be imposed, the law enforcement agency issuing the citation or its designee shall take reasonable actions to notify the child’s parent, guardian or custodian.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.7; W.S. 1977, §

14-8-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 3; 2008, ch. 18, § 1; 2010, ch. 22, § 1; 2013 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “a court order issued pursuant to this act” for “court order” in (b).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “In accordance with procedures specified in W.S. 7-1-108(c) and (d)” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Timely notification by another officer negated defendant's argument against admissibility of statement. —

Defendant's argument that failure to furnish notification required by subsection (b) would make her statement to police inadmissible was not addressed by court where timely notification was given to mother by another officer of the law enforcement agency which took defendant into custody. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

M.M. v. State, 827 P.2d 1117,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of court to order juvenile delinquent incarcerated in adult penal institution, 95 ALR3d 568.

Truancy as indicative of delinquency or incorrigibility, justifying commitment of infant or juvenile, 5 ALR4th 1211.

When, under terms of Federal Youth Corrections Act (18 USC § 5005 et seq. [repealed]), must prisoner serving youth corrections sentence be segregated from adult prison population, 59 ALR Fed 746.

§ 14-6-207.
Detention or shelter care; delivery of child pending hearing; placing children; separate detention; notice if no court order.

If detention or shelter care of a child appears necessary to the person taking custody of the child, the child shall be delivered as soon as possible to the court or to the detention or shelter care facility designated by the court pending a hearing.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

A child alleged to be delinquent shall if necessary, be detained in a separate detention home or facility for delinquent children.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

The person in charge of any detention or shelter care facility shall promptly notify the court and the district attorney of any child being detained or cared for at the facility without a court order and shall deliver the child to the court upon request.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.8; W.S. 1977, §

14-8-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1990, ch. 99, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 210, § 2; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of court to order juvenile delinquent incarcerated in adult penal institution, 95 ALR3d 568.

Truancy as indicative of delinquency or incorrigibility, justifying commitment of infant or juvenile, 5 ALR4th 1211.

When, under terms of Federal Youth Corrections Act (18 USC § 5005 et seq. [repealed]), must prisoner serving youth corrections sentence be segregated from adult prison population, 59 ALR Fed 746.

§ 14-6-208.
Notice of detention to be given district attorney; written statement required; duty of district attorney.

When a child is taken into custody without a court order and is placed in detention or shelter care, the person taking custody of the child shall notify the district attorney without delay. Also the person shall as soon as possible file a brief written statement with the district attorney setting forth the facts which led to taking the child into custody and the reason why the child was not released.

Upon receiving notice that a child is being held in detention or shelter care, the district attorney shall immediately review the need for detention or shelter care and may order the child released unless he determines detention or shelter care is necessary under the provisions of W.S. 14-6-206(a) or unless ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.9; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-109; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Cited

in

NJC v. State, 913 P.2d 435,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 14-6-209.
Taking of child into custody; informal hearing where no court order; conditional release; evidence; rehearing.

When a child is placed in detention or shelter care without a court order, a petition as provided in W.S.

14-6-212

shall be promptly filed and presented to the court. An informal detention or shelter care hearing shall be held as soon as reasonably possible not later than forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and legal holidays, after the child is taken into custody to determine if further detention or shelter care is required pending further court action. The child shall be interviewed by the department or its designee prior to the detention or shelter care hearing, but in no event later than twenty-four (24) hours, excluding weekends and legal holidays, after the child is taken into custody. The department or its designee shall submit a written report of the interview to the court, including an assessment of the immediate needs of the child and a recommendation for the most appropriate placement for the child pending disposition of the violation. Written notice stating the time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given to the child and to his parents, guardian or custodian.

At the commencement of the hearing the judge shall advise the child and his parents, guardian or custodian of:

The contents of the petition and the nature of the charges or allegations contained therein;

Their right to counsel as provided in W.S.

14-6-222

;

The child’s right to remain silent with respect to any allegations of a delinquent act;

The right to confront and cross-examine witnesses or to present witnesses and evidence in their own behalf and the right to issuance of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses and the production of evidence;

The right to a jury trial as provided in W.S.

14-6-223

;

The right to appeal as provided in W.S.

14-6-233

; and

All other rights afforded a criminal defendant.

The child shall be given an opportunity to admit or deny the allegations in the petition. If the allegations are admitted, the court shall make the appropriate adjudication and may proceed immediately to a disposition of the case, provided the court has the predisposition report and multidisciplinary team recommendations, in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

14-6-229

, except that a commissioner acting in the absence or incapacity of the judge may take testimony to establish a factual basis and accept an admission and perform all other requirements of the initial hearing but shall not proceed to disposition. If denied, the court shall set a time not to exceed sixty (60) days for an adjudicatory hearing or a transfer hearing, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing. In no case shall the court hold the adjudicatory hearing more than ninety (90) days after the date the petition is filed.

Regardless of whether the allegations in the petition are admitted or denied, the court shall determine whether or not the child’s full-time detention or shelter care is required pending further proceedings. If the court finds that returning the child to the home is contrary to the welfare of the child, the court shall enter the finding on the record and order the child placed in the legal custody of the department. The court shall explain the terms of the court order to the child, his parents or legal guardian and any other person the court deems necessary. If the court finds that full-time detention or shelter care is not required, the court shall order the child released and may impose one (1) or more of the following conditions:

Place the child in the custody and supervision of his parents, guardian or custodian, under the protective supervision of the department or a county or state probation officer or under the supervision of any individual or organization approved by the court that agrees to supervise the child;

Place restrictions on the child’s travel, associates, activities or place of abode during the period of his release, including a requirement that the child return to the physical custody of his parents, guardian or custodian at specified hours; or

Impose any other terms and conditions of release deemed reasonably necessary to assure the appearance of the child at subsequent proceedings.

All relevant and material evidence helpful in determining the need for detention or shelter care may be admitted by the court even though not competent in an adjudicatory hearing on the allegations of the petition.

If a child is not released after a detention or shelter care hearing and it appears by sworn statement of the parents, guardian or custodian that they did not receive notice and did not waive notice and appearance at the hearing, the court shall rehear the matter without delay.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.10; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-110; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1997, ch. 199, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2008, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “forty-eight (48) hours” for “seventy-two (72) hours,” and inserted “excluding weekends and legal holidays” preceding “after the child is taken into custody”; in (b)(iv), inserted “and evidence” following “witnesses or to present witnesses,” and “and the right to issuance of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses and the production of evidence” at the end; rewrote (c), adding the proviso and exception in the second sentence, the limitation in the third sentence, and adding the fourth sentence; in (d) inserted the second sentence, and in (d)(i) inserted “protective” preceding “supervision of the department.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted the present third and fourth sentences in (a);
inserted the present third sentence in the introductory language in (d).

Jurisdiction. —

Juvenile court did not lose subject matter jurisdiction after it failed to hold an adjudicatory hearing within the 90-day statutory deadline of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 14-6-209(c) and 14-6-226(b); because the legislature did not unequivocally state that a juvenile court loses subject matter jurisdiction if the 90-day deadline is not met, the juvenile court did not lose jurisdiction over the case when it held the adjudicatory hearing past the deadline. BC-K v. State, 2022 WY 80, 512 P.3d 634,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2022).

Jurisdiction retained beyond 60 days. —

The court was not in error for refusing to grant a parent's motion to dismiss for lack of jurisdiction even though the petition for juvenile abuse/neglect was not adjudicated within 60 days. This section and §

14-6-226

only require that the court shall set a time for a hearing within 60 days. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Remedy for failure to set hearing. —

The proper remedy for a failure to set an adjudicatory hearing within the time constraints of this section and §

14-6-226

is a motion to the juvenile court for a prompt hearing brought by the minor through the guardian ad litem, or brought by the parents, guardians or custodian named in the petition as parties to the proceeding; if such a motion is not acted upon in a timely fashion, then a petition for a writ of habeas corpus may be filed in the supreme court seeking release of the minor. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Court need not accept admission at hearing. —

Subsection (c) of this section and §

14-6-226

(a) through (c) do not require the juvenile court to accept an admission at the initial hearing or the detention hearing. Nor do they prohibit the juvenile court from continuing those hearings while it conducts a transfer hearing. McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995) (decided prior to 1995 amendments of §

14-6-226

).

Findings of court. —

Without a request for findings under Rule 52, W.R.C.P., the supreme court considers that the general findings by the juvenile court carries with it every finding of fact which is supported by the record. In In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Commissioner's order not entitled to res judicata. —

An order by a district court commissioner, made following a shelter care hearing conducted after the filing of a petition in juvenile court alleging neglect of a child, was not a final disposition of the issues and entitled to recognition under the doctrine of res judicata. In In Interest of AB, 839 P.2d 386,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of rules of evidence to juvenile transfer, waiver, or certification hearings, 37 ALR5th 703.

§ 14-6-210.
Hearing conducted by commissioner; authority and duty; review by court.

In the absence or incapacity of the judge, the detention or shelter care hearing may be conducted by a district court commissioner of the county in which the child is being detained or held in shelter care.

The commissioner may make any order concerning the child’s release, continued detention or shelter care as authorized to the judge under W.S.

14-6-209

. If the child is not released after the hearing, the commissioner shall promptly file with the court a complete written resume of the evidence adduced at the hearing and his reasons for not releasing the child. The commissioner shall conduct the hearing pursuant to W.S.

14-6-209

except that, if a child who has been advised of his rights wishes to admit the allegations, the commissioner may take testimony to establish a factual basis and accept the admission and perform all other requirements of the initial hearing but shall not proceed to disposition. The hearing shall be conducted in the presence of counsel and guardian ad litem, if so appointed. The commissioner may also appoint counsel, appoint a guardian ad litem, order a predisposition report, appoint a multidisciplinary team, issue subpoenas or search warrants, order physical or medical examinations and authorize emergency medical, surgical or dental treatment all as provided in this act. The commissioner shall not make final orders of adjudication or disposition.

The court shall review the reports, orders and actions of the commissioner as soon as reasonably possible and confirm or modify the commissioner’s orders and actions as it deems appropriate.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.11; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-111; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1993, ch. 210, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), inserted the third and fourth sentences, inserted “appoint counsel, appoint a guardian ad litem, order a predisposition report, appoint a multidisciplinary team” in the fourth sentence, and substituted “this act” for “W.S.

14-6-217

through

14-6-220

.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Commissioner's order not entitled to res judicata. —

An order by a district court commissioner, made following a shelter care hearing conducted after the filing of a petition in juvenile court alleging neglect of a child, was not a final disposition of the issues and entitled to recognition under the doctrine of res judicata. In In Interest of AB, 839 P.2d 386,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 14-6-211.
Complaints alleging delinquency; investigation and determination by district attorney.

Complaints alleging a child is delinquent shall be referred to the office of the district attorney. The district attorney shall determine whether the best interest of the child or of the public require that judicial action be taken. The department, the county sheriff and the county probation departments shall provide the district attorney with any assistance he may require in making an investigation. The district attorney shall prepare and file a petition with the court if he believes action is necessary to protect the interest of the public or child.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.12; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-112; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1995, ch. 177, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references. —

As to duties of county attorney generally, see §

18-3-302

.

Quoted

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Truancy as indicative of delinquency or incorrigibility, justifying commitment of infant or juvenile, 5 ALR4th 1211.

Defense of infancy in juvenile delinquency proceedings, 83 ALR4th 1135.

§ 14-6-212.
Commencement of proceedings; contents of petition.

Proceedings in juvenile court are commenced by filing a petition with the clerk of the court. The petition and all subsequent pleadings, motions, orders and decrees shall be entitled “State of Wyoming, In the Interest of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , minor.” A petition shall be signed by the district attorney on information and belief of the alleged facts. All petitions must be verified.

The petition shall set forth all jurisdictional facts, including but not limited to:

The child’s name, date of birth and address;

The names and addresses of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian and spouse, if any;

Whether the child is being held in detention or shelter care and if so, the name and address of the facility and the time detention or shelter care commenced; and

A statement setting forth with particularity the facts which bring the child within the provisions of W.S.

14-6-203

. If the basis of the petition is an alleged delinquent act based upon a violation of the laws of the state or a political subdivision, the petition shall cite the alleged law violated.

The petition shall state if any of the facts enumerated in subsection (b) of this section are unknown.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.13; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-113; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 221, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, provides that: “The provisions of W.S. 14-3-427(e) and (f), 14-3-429(d), 14-6-227(e) and (f) and 14-6-427(e) and (f) as amended by section 1 of this act, shall apply to child protection cases in which a petition was filed under W.S.

14-3-412

,

14-6-212

or

14-6-412

on or after July 1, 2009.”

Minor's due process rights violated. —

Trial court violated minor's due process rights when it found her in contempt of court and placed her in a school for girls without notifying her that she could be declared to be a delinquent child and placed in the girls' school if she violated the juvenile court's order and the court failed to file a petition in the juvenile court stating the jurisdictional facts as required by §

14-6-212

.TLL v. State (In the Interest of TLL), 899 P.2d 44,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993); Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

§ 14-6-213.
Order to appear; contents thereof; when child taken into immediate custody; waiver of service.

After a petition is filed, the court shall issue an order to appear. The order shall:

State the name of the court, the title of the proceedings and the time and place for the initial hearing;

Direct the persons named therein to appear personally at the hearing and direct the person having actual physical custody or control of the child to present the child before the court at the hearing;

Be directed to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian and spouse, if any, and to any other person the court deems necessary; and

Be directed to the child alleged to be delinquent.

If it appears to the court by affidavit by the district attorney based on actual knowledge or on information and belief that the conduct, condition or surroundings of the child seriously endanger the child’s health or welfare or the health, welfare or property of others, that the child may abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court or that the child will not be brought before the court notwithstanding service of the order, the court may direct in the order to appear that the person serving the order take the child into immediate custody and bring him before the court.

Service of the order may be waived either in writing or by voluntary appearance at the hearing, provided a child may waive service of the order only with the consent of his parents, guardian, custodian, guardian ad litem or counsel.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.14; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-114; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2.

Cited

in

KT v. State, 902 P.2d 1288,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 14-6-214.
Service of process; order of custody or detention.

In proceedings under this act, service of order to appear or other process within the state shall be made by the sheriff of the county where service is made, by his undersheriff or deputy or by any law enforcement officer or responsible adult not a party to the proceeding and appointed by the clerk.

Within the state, service of order to appear is made by personally delivering a copy of the order together with a copy of the petition to the person ordered to appear, provided that parents of a child may both be served by personally delivering to either parent two (2) copies of the order and petition, one (1) copy for each parent. A child under the age of fourteen (14) years is served by delivering a copy of the order together with a copy of the petition to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or other adult having the actual physical custody and control of the child or to a guardian ad litem or attorney appointed for the child.

If it appears to the court by affidavit that the parents, guardian or custodian of the child cannot be found within the state, the court may order personal service outside the state or service by certified mail with return receipt requested signed by addressee only. If the address of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian is unknown and cannot with reasonable diligence be ascertained, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the child and to receive service of process.

Service by certified mail is complete on the date the clerk receives the return receipt signed by addressee. Personal service either within or outside the state is complete on the date when copies of the order to appear and petition are delivered to the person to be served.

When personal service of order to appear is made within the state, service shall be completed not less than two (2) days before the hearing and when made outside the state, service shall be completed not less than five (5) days before the hearing. However, notwithstanding any provision within this act, the court may order that a child be taken into custody as provided in W.S.

14-6-213

or that a child be held in detention or shelter care pending further proceedings as provided in W.S.

14-6-209

, even though service of order to appear on the parents, guardian or custodian of the child is not complete at the time of making the order.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.15; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-115; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

Cross references. —

For service of process, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, twice in (e), substituted “shall be completed” for “must be completed.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Law reviews. —

For article “Observations and Suggestions Concerning Wyoming Statutes Relating to Adoption Based on Abandonment,” see VIII Wyo. L.J. 218 (1954).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Service of process in juvenile court proceedings, 90 ALR2d 293.

§ 14-6-215.
Presence of parent, custodian or guardian at hearing; failure to appear; avoidance of service; issuance of bench warrant.

The court shall insure the presence at any hearing of the parents, guardian or custodian of any child subject to the proceedings under this act.

Any person served with an order to appear as provided in W.S.

14-6-214

and without reasonable cause fails to appear, is liable for contempt of court and the court may issue a bench warrant to cause the person to be brought before the court.

If the child, his parents, guardian or custodian or any other person willfully avoids or refuses service of order to appear, or it appears to the court that service of the order will be ineffectual or that the welfare of the child requires that he be brought immediately into the custody of the court, a bench warrant may be issued by the court for the child or his parents, guardian, custodian or any person having the actual physical custody or control of the child.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.16; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-116; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to presence of a parent, custodian, or guardian at a proceeding in juvenile court, see §

14-2-205

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).